trunk/incubator/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="ateist__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ernes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alibi__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ernes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sli/k__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kket</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kkene</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ks</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kkets</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ks</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kkenes</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="spiller__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sko__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gla/s__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sset</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ssene</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ss</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ssets</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ss</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ssenes</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="aftegning"><i>aftegning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anpartsselskab"><i>anpartsselskab</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arabesk"><i>arabesk</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barneansigt"><i>barneansigt</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="begrebsverden"><i>begrebsverden</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boligselskab"><i>boligselskab</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boligspekulant"><i>boligspekulant</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chanson"><i>chanson</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="citat"><i>citat</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="derivation"><i>derivation</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="docentur"><i>docentur</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="druesaft"><i>druesaft</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="erotisering"><i>erotisering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eukalyptustræ"><i>eukalyptustræ</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fjeldmark"><i>fjeldmark</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fjernvarmeværk"><i>fjernvarmeværk</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fortælling"><i>fortælling</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuskeri"><i>fuskeri</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gerning"><i>gerning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hejseværk"><i>hejseværk</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="husbond"><i>husbond</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="isætning"><i>isætning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kæresteri"><i>kæresteri</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kollektivist"><i>kollektivist</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kommuniké"><i>kommuniké</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="loppemarked"><i>loppemarked</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="medhjælp"><i>medhjælp</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nodestativ"><i>nodestativ</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="overmaling"><i>overmaling</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plankeværk"><i>plankeværk</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="relaksation"><i>relaksation</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sekret"><i>sekret</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjælevandring"><i>sjælevandring</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sprængstofattentat"><i>sprængstofattentat</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strækmarch"><i>strækmarch</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="telegrafvæsen"><i>telegrafvæsen</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tossestreg"><i>tossestreg</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uriaspost"><i>uriaspost</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zinkliniment"><i>zinkliniment</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anilin"><i>anilin</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barkøkken"><i>barkøkken</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boks"><i>boks</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="crepenylon"><i>crepenylon</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="driftsproblem"><i>driftsproblem</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fakultet"><i>fakultet</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fodpanel"><i>fodpanel</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gadeareal"><i>gadeareal</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hold"><i>hold</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kammeratskab"><i>kammeratskab</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kradseri"><i>kradseri</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mal"><i>mal</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opdag"><i>opdag</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="print"><i>print</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rullegardin"><i>rullegardin</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skandskrift"><i>skandskrift</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snerperi"><i>snerperi</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stempelpapir"><i>stempelpapir</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="syndikat"><i>syndikat</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tovtrækkeri"><i>tovtrækkeri</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="værksted"><i>værksted</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afskedsfest"><i>afskedsfest</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="astrild"><i>astrild</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blækstift"><i>blækstift</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cineast"><i>cineast</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="døgnvagt"><i>døgnvagt</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fabrikering"><i>fabrikering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forfølgning"><i>forfølgning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gnidning"><i>gnidning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="indtjening"><i>indtjening</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kommandotast"><i>kommandotast</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lovgivning"><i>lovgivning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="not"><i>not</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pingvin"><i>pingvin</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="relæstation"><i>relæstation</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sekundering"><i>sekundering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="søgning"><i>søgning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="supposition"><i>supposition</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tørlast"><i>tørlast</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udtværing"><i>udtværing</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
